Hawaii, session 2026, HB2289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the statewide automated victim information and notification system, established under section 353-132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and administered by the department of corrections and rehabilitation's victim notification services office, plays a vital role in ensuring crime victims are promptly informed of changes in an offender's custody status.  The statewide automated victim information and notification system provides real-time notifications to victims and community members regarding custody changes, parole hearings, and other key events, and is essential for protecting victims' rights, safety, and peace of mind.  Demand for these services continues to grow, with victim registrations increasing by 38.9 per cent between fiscal year 2022-2023 and fiscal year 2024-2025 (from 42,182 to 58,606).  The statewide automated victim information and notification system is funded through the automated victim information and notification system special fund established under section 353-136, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The legislature further finds that the existing $600,000 annual expenditure cap on the special fund has become outdated and limits the victim notification services office's ability to strengthen victim services, improve system infrastructure, and support operational needs.  Payroll costs continue to rise due to collective bargaining increases, but the existing cap prevents the department of corrections and rehabilitation from adjusting allocations accordingly.  As a result, payroll increases reduce available operating funds for operations.  Operating expenses have also increased, including contract costs for the system itself, which rose 9.17 per cent in fiscal year 2025-2026 (from $90,636 to $98,944) and are projected to grow by three per cent annually in subsequent years.  Rent, lease, internet, and telephone costs have also risen. Looking ahead, if all four authorized positions are filled, projected expenditures will exceed the existing statutory expenditure ceiling.  The automated victim information and notification system special fund has a cash balance of more than $1,500,000.  Removing the expenditure cap will ensure the victim notification services office can sustain operations demands, support staff salaries, and maintain uninterrupted services statewide. The purpose of this Act is to repeal the statutory expenditure ceiling on the automated victim information and notification system special fund. SECTION 2.  Section 353-136, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§353-136[]]  Automated victim information and notification system special fund; authorization of payment.  (a) There is established a special fund to be known as the automated victim information and notification system special fund, to be administered by the department.  Interest and investment earnings credited to the assets of the fund shall become part of the fund.  Any remaining balance in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried over to the next fiscal year. (b)  Any item purchased by an in-state or out-of-state inmate from a correctional facility commissary shall be subject to a four per cent surcharge on the item's price. The proceeds from the surcharge shall be deposited into the automated victim information and notification system special fund. (c)  All proceeds or revenues that are derived from any commission that is realized pursuant to a telephone service agreement executed by the department for the provision of telephone services for inmates shall be deposited into the automated victim information and notification system special fund. (d)  Moneys received pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) shall be used for the development and operating expenses, including salaries and benefits of positions as authorized by the legislature, of the system. [(e) The sum total of all moneys expended for development and operating expenses, including salaries and benefits of positions as authorized by the legislature, shall not exceed the special fund ceiling related to the fund established by the legislature; provided that the total moneys expended for these purposes shall not exceed $600,000 in any one fiscal year. (f)] (e)  Federal funds shall not be transferred to, or deposited into, the automated victim information and notification system special fund." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.